Utah statutes.
26-3-10.   Department measures to protect security of health data.
The department shall protect the security of identifiable health data by use
of the following measures and any other measures adopted by rule:
(1)  limit access to identifiable  health data to authorized individuals who
have received training in the handling of such data;
(2)  designate a person to be responsible for physical security;
(3)  develop and implement a system for monitoring security; and
(4)  review periodically all identifiable health data to determine whether
identifying characteristics should be removed from the data.
